Utah statutes.
67-1a-2.2.   Residences in more than one district -- Lieutenant governor to resolve.

(1)  If, in reviewing a map generated from a redistricting block assignment file, the lieutenant governor determines that a single-family or multi-family residence is within more than one Congressional, Senate, House, or State Board of Education district, the lieutenant governor may, by January 31, 2012, and in consultation with the Automated Geographic Reference Center, determine the district to which the residence is assigned.

(2)  In order to make the determination required by Subsection (1), the lieutenant governor shall review the block assignment file and other Bureau of the Census data and obtain and review other relevant data such as aerial photography or other data about the area.

(3)  Upon making the determination authorized by this section, the lieutenant governor shall notify county clerks affected by the determination and the Automated Geographic Reference Center created under Section 63F-1-506.

